Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 20258-2723
Records; maintenance; requirements.

(1) A licensee shall maintain the following records, for determining the licensee's compliance with the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act, for at least five years:

(a) A record of each outstanding money transmission obligation sold;

(b) A general ledger posted at least monthly containing all asset, liability, capital, income, and expense accounts;

(c) Bank statements and bank reconciliation records;

(d) Records of outstanding money transmission obligations;

(e) Records of each outstanding money transmission obligation paid;

(f) A list of the last-known names and addresses of all of the licensee's authorized delegates; and

(g) Any other records the director reasonably requires by rule or regulation.

(2) The items specified in subsection (1) of this section may be maintained in any form of record.

(3) Records specified in subsection (1) of this section may be maintained outside this state if they are made accessible to the director within seven business days after notice.

(4) All records maintained by the licensee as required in subsection (1) of this section are subject to inspection by the director pursuant to section 8-2707.

Laws 2013, LB616, § 23;

Laws 2025, LB474, § 28.